Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1599.02
Nebraska representatives to commission; appointment.

Pursuant to the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, Nebraska as the host state shall have two at-large voting members and one nonvoting member from the county in which the facility is located on the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Commission. The members of the commission representing Nebraska shall be appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the members of the Legislature, and such members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Governor shall appoint the nonvoting member upon submission of an application for a license for the operation of a facility or on March 22, 1991, whichever occurs later. The appointees may begin to serve immediately following appointment and prior to approval by the Legislature. If any appointee receives less than majority approval by the members of the Legislature, the Governor shall appoint another person to represent Nebraska on the commission within ten days of the failure to receive such approval. The members representing Nebraska on the commission may, when necessary, designate an alternate member to represent Nebraska.

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 837, § 3.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.